src/morphology/incoming/test-rules.script
#
#Rules for replacing c-stem forms of active (RED) bound pronouns with the correct form (be it A, E, I or O)
#
#


#these definitions must be the same as defined in the root lexicon in moh-root.lexc

define rootBMarker %^R%-%^; # root boundary marker
define pronMarker %^PP%-%^; # marks the start of the personal prefix
#define rootBMarker "^"; # root boundary marker
#define pronMarker "*"; # marks the start of the personal prefix

# agent I (ke)


#define keC  e-> 0 || "*" k _ "^" [ a | e | i | o ] ;

#define keC  {ke}-> k || pronMarker_rootBMarker [ a | e | i | o ] ;

define keC  {ke}-> k || _ [ a | e | i | o ] ;
define cap k -> K ||  _  [ e | o];

define removeR  rootBMarker -> 0 ;
define removeP pronMarker -> 0;


#define reWrite keC .o. removeR .o. removeP;
define reWrite keC .o. cap;

push reWrite
